District of Columbia statutes.
31-1131.18

Regulations.

The Commissioner may promulgate rules and regulations necessary or appropriate to implement the provisions of this chapter.

History

Mar. 27, 2003, D.C. Law 14-264, § 18, 50 DCR 260
May 13, 2008, D.C. Law 17-155, § 2(n), 55 DCR 3683

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 17-155 substituted “necessary or appropriate” for “necessary”.